North Carolina, session 2025, SB746.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Automation during the twentieth century resulted in new job opportunities for
some, but it also rendered other jobs obsolete, affecting many low-income
workers.
(2) Continued automation into the twenty-first century has resulted in the further
diminishment of employment opportunities for some workers, especially
workers who lack computer skills or are disadvantaged by social inequities or
the digital divide.
(3) A comprehensive review of the current and future effects of automation on
the State's workforce will provide government officials, and education and
business leaders, with the information and insight necessary to guide the State
toward mitigating negative effects of automation on workers. This is
especially true in the case of low-income and minority workers.
SECTION 2.(a) Committee Established. – There is established the Study Committee
on Automation and the Workforce (Committee). The Committee shall include 11 voting
members, as follows:
(1) Two persons representing labor organizations or nonprofit organizations
engaged in workforce development efforts in this State, appointed by the
Governor.
(2) Two persons representing employers or trade organizations focused on the
automated workplace, appointed by the Governor.
(3) Two persons who are members of the Senate at the time of appointment, at
least one of whom represents the minority party, appointed by the President
Pro Tempore of the Senate.
(4) Two persons who are members of the House of Representatives at the time of
appointment, at least one of whom represents the minority party, appointed by
the Speaker of the House of Representatives.
(5) Three persons elected to membership by the members of the Committee
designated in subdivisions (1) through (4) of this subsection.
SECTION 2.(b) Nonvoting Members. – The following individuals or the
individual's designee shall serve as a nonvoting ex officio member of the Committee:
(1) The Commissioner of Agriculture.
*S746-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) The Commissioner of Labor.
(3) The Superintendent of Public Instruction.
(4) The Secretary of Commerce.
(5) The State Chief Information Officer.
(6) The President of the North Carolina Community College System.
(7) The President of The University of North Carolina.
SECTION 2.(c) Duties. – The Committee shall serve as a study and advisory
committee on the effects of automation on the State's workforce, with a special emphasis on
low-income and minority workers. The Committee shall review all of the following issues:
(1) The current and potential future impact of the following automation
technologies on the State's low-income workforce:
a. Artificial intelligence.
b. Industrial robotics.
c. Technologies that help customers serve themselves without the
assistance of a human worker.
d. Word processing software, spreadsheet software, and other software
or cloud computing services that reduce or eliminate the need for a
human worker.
(2) How factors such as educational opportunity gaps, geographical location,
urban and rural disparities, social inequities, and income levels or any other
relevant factors affect the displacement of low-income workers by automation
particularly as they affect workers facing systemic barriers to economic
opportunity, including but not limited to low-income, rural, and historically
marginalized populations.
(3) The education, training, and retraining requirements, and other skills
development, that will be necessary to help low-income workers adapt to
automation through the early, middle, and later years of employment to avoid
or defer job displacement, in collaboration with institutions of higher
education, community colleges, vocational training centers, and private-sector
partners.
(4) Recommend strategies for mitigating economic disruption and identifying
new economic opportunities created by automation and artificial intelligence.
The committee's recommendations shall include consideration of workforce
impacts and potential growth within emerging industries projected to expand
alongside these technologies, including clean energy, advanced
manufacturing, technology services, and healthcare, where appropriate.
The Committee may review any other pertinent matter relevant to the effects of
automation on the State's workforce.
SECTION 2.(d) Terms. – Except for the persons elected by the Committee, all
appointing authorities shall make appointments to the Committee by October 1, 2025, and the
terms of all members shall commence on October 1, 2025. The election of members shall be
conducted during the initial organizational meeting of the Committee, with the terms of the
elected members deemed to begin on October 1, 2025.
SECTION 2.(e) Organization/Administration. – The President Pro Tempore of the
Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall each designate a cochair from
among the voting members of the Committee. The cochair appointed by the President Pro
Tempore of the Senate shall preside over the Committee during the odd-numbered year, and the
cochair appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall preside in the
even-numbered year. A cochair may preside at any time during the absence of the presiding
cochair or upon the presiding cochair's designation. The Committee shall meet upon the call of
its cochairs.
Page 2 Senate Bill 746-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
All voting members shall be appointed for a term of two years. Voting members may
be reappointed to successive terms. A vacancy on the Committee shall be filled by the original
appointing authority using the criteria for the prior appointment. Any appointment to fill a
vacancy on the Committee created by the resignation, dismissal, death, disability, or
disqualification of a member shall be for the balance of the unexpired term.
The Governor may remove any member of the Committee for misfeasance,
malfeasance, or nonfeasance, pursuant to the provisions of G.S. 143B-13.
Members of the Committee shall receive per diem and necessary travel and
subsistence expenses in accordance with G.S. 120-3.1, 138-5, and 138-6, as applicable. The
Committee may meet in the Legislative Building or the Legislative Office Building. A majority
of the voting members shall constitute a quorum.
The Legislative Services Officer shall assign professional and clerical staff and
provide other necessary resources to assist the Committee in its work.
SECTION 2.(e1) The Committee shall provide opportunities for public input and
engagement through public hearings, listening sessions, or written submissions.
SECTION 2.(f) Reporting. – The Committee shall submit its initial written report to
the Governor and to the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations prior to the
convening of the 2027 General Assembly, and thereafter it shall report biennially. The report
shall contain a detailed summary of conclusions and recommendations for each issue reviewed
under this act. Any advice recommending a change to a policy, rule, or law shall be accompanied
by a specific policy or legislative proposal and the estimated cost of implementing the change.
SECTION 3. Effective Date. – This act is effective when it becomes law.
Senate Bill 746-First Edition Page 3